Maryland, session 2025, SB0098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2B–01.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0098*

SENATE BILL 98
(a) The Baltimore County Board of Education consists of:
(1) Seven nonpartisan elected members;
(2) Four appointed members; and
(3) One student member.
3–2B–05.
(a) The student member shall:
(1) Be an 11th or a 12th grade student in the Baltimore County public
school system elected by the middle school and high school students of the county in
accordance with procedures established by the Baltimore County student councils;
(2) Serve for 1 year;
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, BE A VOTING
MEMBER; and
[(3)] (4) Advise the county board on the thoughts and feelings of students.
(b) Unless invited to attend by an affirmative vote of a majority of the county
board, the student member may not attend an executive session [that relates to:
(1) Hearings on appeals of special education placements;
(2) Hearings held under § 6–202(a) of this article; or
(3) Collective bargaining] RELATING TO A MATTER ON WHICH THE
STUDENT MEMBER MAY NOT VOTE.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the student member may vote on [all
matters except those relating] ANY MATTER BEFORE THE COUNTY BOARD EXCEPT A
MATTER THAT RELATES to:
(1) [§ 6–202(a)] HEARINGS HELD UNDER § 6–202 of this article;
(2) [Collective bargaining; and] THE DISMISSAL OF OR OTHER
DISCIPLINARY ACTION INVOLVING PERSONNEL; OR
(3) [School closings, reopenings, and boundaries] APPEALS TO THE
COUNTY BOARD UNDER § 4–205 OF THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 98 3
(d) On AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF a majority [vote] of the nonstudent members,
the county board may [determine, on a case–by–case basis, whether a matter under
consideration is covered by the exclusionary provisions listed in subsection (c) of this
section] EXPAND THE MATTER ON WHICH THE STUDENT MEMBER MAY VOTE.
(e) (1) On or before December 31, 2023, a workgroup composed of several
members of the county board and the executive leadership of the Baltimore County public
school system shall develop a draft curriculum for budget training for student members of
the county board and submit the draft curriculum to the county board for review.
(2) The training for student members shall:
(i) Focus on the operating and capital budget process of the county
board; and
(ii) Be facilitated by representatives of the Baltimore County public
school system’s Division of Business Services.
(3) Each student member shall be required to complete the budget
training[:
(i) Within] WITHIN 2 months of the student member’s election to
the county board[; and
(ii) In order to be eligible to vote on budgetary matters].
3–5B–01.
(a) The Frederick County Board consists of eight members as follows:
(1) Seven members elected from the county at large; and
(2) One [nonvoting] student member.
(e) (1) The student member shall:
(i) Be an eleventh or twelfth grade student in the Frederick County
public school system elected by the high school students of the county in accordance with
procedures established by the school system;
(ii) Serve for 1 year beginning on July 1 after the election of the
member;
(iii) [Be] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BE
a [nonvoting] VOTING member; and

SENATE BILL 98
(iv) Advise the county board on the thoughts and feelings of students.
(2) Unless invited to attend by an affirmative vote of a majority of the
county board, the student member may not attend an executive session RELATING TO A
MATTER ON WHICH THE STUDENT MEMBER MAY NOT VOTE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STUDENT MEMBER MAY VOTE ON ANY MATTER BEFORE THE COUNTY BOARD EXCEPT
A MATTER THAT RELATES TO:
1. HEARINGS HELD UNDER § 6–202 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. THE DISMISSAL OF OR OTHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION
INVOLVING PERSONNEL; OR
3. APPEALS TO THE COUNTY BOARD UNDER § 4–205 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(II) ON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE ELECTED
MEMBERS, THE COUNTY BOARD MAY EXPAND THE MATTERS ON WHICH THE
STUDENT MEMBER MAY VOTE.
3–701.
(a) (1) The Howard County Board consists of:
(i) Seven elected members; and
(ii) One student member.
(2) The seven elected members shall be elected as follows:
(i) One member from each of the five councilmanic districts in the
county, elected by the voters of that district; and
(ii) Two members at large, elected by the voters of the county.
(f) (1) The student member shall be a bona fide resident of Howard County
and a regularly enrolled junior or senior year student from a Howard County public high
school.
(2) The student member shall serve for a term of 1 year beginning on July
1 after the member’s election, subject to confirmation of the election results by the county
board.
(3) The nomination and election process for the student member:

SENATE BILL 98 5
(i) Shall be approved by the Howard County Board of Education;
(ii) Shall include a provision that provides for the replacement of one
or both of the final candidates if one or both of them are unable, ineligible, or disqualified
to proceed in the election; and
(iii) Shall allow for any student in grades 6 through 11 enrolled in a
Howard County public school to vote directly for one of the two student member candidates.
(4) The student member candidate who receives the second highest
number of votes in the direct election:
(i) Shall become the alternate student member; and
(ii) Shall serve if the student member who is elected is unable,
ineligible, or disqualified to complete the student member’s term of office.
(5) Except as provided in paragraphs (6) and (7) of this subsection, the
student member has the same rights and privileges as an elected member.
(6) Unless invited to attend by the affirmative vote of a majority of the
county board, the student member may not attend [a closed session addressing a matter on
which a student member is prohibited from voting under paragraph (7) of this subsection]
AN EXECUTIVE SESSION RELATING TO A MATTER ON WHICH THE STUDENT MEMBER
MAY NOT VOTE.
[(7) The student member shall vote on all matters except those relating to:
(i) Geographical attendance areas under § 4–109 of this article;
(ii) Acquisition and disposition of real property and matters
pertaining to school construction under § 4–115 of this article;
(iii) Employment of architects under § 4–117 of this article;
(iv) Donations under § 4–118 of this article;
(v) Condemnation under § 4–119 of this article;
(vi) Consolidation of schools and transportation of students under §
4–120 of this article;
(vii) Appointment and salary of a county superintendent under §§
4–201 and 4–202 of this article;

SENATE BILL 98
(viii) Employee discipline and other appeals under § 4–205(c) of this
article;
(ix) Budgetary matters under Title 5 of this article;
(x) Appointment and promotion of staff under § 6–201 of this article;
(xi) Discipline of certificated staff under § 6–202 of this article;
(xii) Collective bargaining for certificated employees under Title 6,
Subtitle 4 of this article;
(xiii) Collective bargaining for noncertificated employees under Title
6, Subtitle 5 of this article; and
(xiv) Student suspension and expulsion under § 7–305 of this article.]
(7) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STUDENT MEMBER MAY VOTE ON ANY MATTER BEFORE THE COUNTY BOARD EXCEPT
A MATTER THAT RELATES TO:
1. HEARINGS HELD UNDER § 6–202 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. THE DISMISSAL OF OR OTHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION
INVOLVING PERSONNEL; OR
3. APPEALS TO THE COUNTY BOARD UNDER § 4–205 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(II) ON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE ELECTED
MEMBERS, THE COUNTY BOARD MAY EXPAND THE MATTERS ON WHICH THE
STUDENT MEMBER MAY VOTE.
(8) The student member may not receive compensation but, after
submitting expense vouchers, shall be reimbursed for out–of–pocket expenses incurred in
connection with official duties, in accordance with the procedures and regulations
established by the county board.
3–1301.
(a) The Washington County Board consists of [seven] EIGHT members.
(b) (1) [All seven] SEVEN members of the Washington County Board shall be
VOTING MEMBERS elected from Washington County at large at a general election every 4
years beginning in 1978.

SENATE BILL 98 7
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, ONE MEMBER OF
THE WASHINGTON COUNTY BOARD SHALL BE A NONVOTING STUDENT MEMBER.
(c) (1) Each VOTING member serves for a term of 4 years beginning on the
first Tuesday in December after the member’s election and until a successor is elected and
qualifies.
(2) The terms of VOTING members are staggered as required by the terms
of the members serving on the county board as of July 1, 1986.
(3) At the end of a term, a VOTING member continues to serve until a
successor is elected and qualifies.
(4) In accordance with subsection (f) of this section, the County
Commissioners shall appoint a qualified individual to fill any vacancy OF A VOTING
MEMBER on the county board for the remainder of that term and until a successor is elected
and qualifies.
(d) (1) Immediately preceding the date the VOTING member takes office, each
member of the county board shall be:
(i) A resident of Washington County for at least 6 months; and
(ii) A resident of the State for at least 12 months.
(2) (i) During the term of a VOTING member of the county board, the
member shall maintain a primary residence in Washington County.
(ii) A VOTING member of the county board who no longer maintains
a primary residence in Washington County may not continue as a member of the county
board.
(e) (1) The State Board may remove a VOTING member of the county board
for:
(i) Immorality;
(ii) Misconduct in office;
(iii) Incompetency; or
(iv) Willful neglect of duty.

SENATE BILL 98
(2) Before removing a VOTING member, the State Board shall send the
member a copy of the charges against [him] THE MEMBER and give [him] THE MEMBER
an opportunity within 10 days to request a hearing.
(3) If the VOTING member requests a hearing within the 10–day period:
(i) The State Board promptly shall hold a hearing, but a hearing
may not be set within 10 days after the State Board sends the member a notice of the
hearing; and
(ii) The member shall have an opportunity to be heard publicly
before the State Board in [his] THE MEMBER’S own defense, in person or by counsel.
(4) A VOTING member removed under this subsection has the right to a de
novo review of the removal by the Circuit Court for Washington County.
(f) (1) In this section, “Washington County Delegation” means the Senators
and Delegates in the General Assembly of Maryland who are elected to represent
Washington County or any portion of Washington County.
(2) There is a Washington County School Board Nominating Commission.
(3) The Commission shall consist of the following six voting members:
(i) One member appointed by the Senate members of the
Washington County Delegation;
(ii) One member appointed by the Delegate members of the
Washington County Delegation;
(iii) One member appointed by the county board; and
(iv) The following three members appointed by the County
Commissioners:
1. One member representing the Washington County
business community;
2. One member representing the Washington County
Citizens Advisory Council; and
3. One member representing the Washington County
educational community.
(4) (i) The Chairman of the Commission shall be a member of the public
appointed by the County Commissioners.

SENATE BILL 98 9
(ii) The Chairman may not be a member of either the county board
or the Washington County Delegation.
(iii) The Chairman is a nonvoting member of the Commission who
shall vote only when there is a tie vote among the voting members of the Commission.
(5) The County Commissioners shall provide the staff for the Commission.
(6) The Commission shall:
(i) Advertise the vacancy and provide the procedures for filling the
vacancy in at least one medium accessible to the general public, which includes:
1. A newspaper of general circulation in the region; or
2. An electronic posting on the local school system website;
and
(ii) Before selecting any nominees, hold at least one public hearing.
(7) Within 30 days of the vacancy occurring, the Commission shall submit
the names of no more than three nominees to the County Commissioners for their
consideration.
(8) Within 15 days after receiving the names of the nominees provided by
the Commission under paragraph (7) of this subsection, the County Commissioners shall
select an individual to fill the vacancy on the county board.
(G) (1) THE STUDENT MEMBER SHALL:
(I) BE AN ELEVENTH OR A TWELFTH GRADE STUDENT IN THE
WASHINGTON COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM ELECTED BY THE HIGH SCHOOL
STUDENTS OF THE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY
THE SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) BE A STUDENT GOVERNMENT ASSOCIATION
REPRESENTATIVE AT THE STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL;
(III) SERVE FOR 1 YEAR BEGINNING ON JULY 1 AFTER THE
ELECTION OF THE STUDENT MEMBER; AND
(IV) ADVISE THE COUNTY BOARD ON THE THOUGHTS AND
FEELINGS OF STUDENTS IN WASHINGTON COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.

SENATE BILL 98
(2) UNLESS INVITED TO ATTEND BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A
MAJORITY OF THE COUNTY BOARD, THE STUDENT MEMBER MAY NOT ATTEND AN
EXECUTIVE SESSION OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
3–1302.
(a) (1) The president of the county board and the other VOTING members are
entitled to receive compensation annually as set by the County Commissioners of
Washington County under Title 28, Subtitle 2 of the Local Government Article.
(2) Each VOTING member of the Washington County Board of Education
is entitled to health insurance and to other fringe benefits regularly provided to employees
of the board of education.
(b) After submitting vouchers, VOTING members shall be reimbursed for travel
and other expenses within the limit set by the Washington County Commissioners.
(C) (1) (I) A STUDENT MEMBER WHO COMPLETES A FULL TERM ON
THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL BE ENTITLED TO A SCHOLARSHIP OF $3,500 TO BE
APPLIED TO THE STUDENT’S HIGHER EDUCATION COSTS.
(II) THE SCHOLARSHIP SHALL BE PAID DIRECTLY TO THE
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT THE STUDENT ATTENDS.
(III) A STUDENT MAY RECEIVE NOT MORE THAN TWO
SCHOLARSHIPS OF $3,500 EACH REGARDLESS OF THE NUMBER OF TERMS THE
STUDENT SERVES AS THE STUDENT MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
(IV) THE SCHOLARSHIP MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED
COMPENSATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF CALCULATING TAXABLE INCOME.
(2) ON THE SUBMISSION OF EXPENSE VOUCHERS, THE STUDENT
MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER EXPENSES
INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL DUTIES FOR THE COUNTY BOARD.
(3) THE STUDENT MEMBER IS NOT ENTITLED TO ANY COMPENSATION
OR PAYMENT OTHER THAN THAT SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION FOR WORK AS THE STUDENT MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.